Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1219
Board; administrator; appointment; compensation; duties.

Each board of an educational service unit deciding to provide supplementary services shall appoint and fix the compensation and duties of an administrator, who shall be a person experienced in public school administration and who shall hold at least a standard administrative certificate. With the advice of the administrator, the board shall also employ and fix the compensation and duties of such professional and clerical assistants as shall be necessary. No board member of an educational service unit shall be employed by the educational service unit board on which he or she is a board member.

Laws 1965, c. 504, § 5, p. 1610;

Laws 1987, LB 688, § 22;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2205;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 936.